Utah statutes.
34A-2-1003.   Issuance of a waiver.

(1)  The commission shall issue a workers' compensation coverage waiver to a business entity that:

(a)  elects not to include an owner, partner, or corporate officer or director as an employee under a workers' compensation policy in accordance with Section 34A-2-103 and Subsection 34A-2-104(4);

(b)  employs no other employee on the day on which the commission issues the waiver to the business entity;

(c)  provides to the commission the information required by Section 34A-2-1004; and

(d)  pays a fee established by the commission in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, except that the fee may not exceed $50.

(2) (a)  A waiver issued under this section expires one year from the day on which it is issued unless renewed by the holder of the waiver.

(b)  To renew a waiver issued under this part, the holder of the waiver shall:

(i)  employ no other employee on the day on which the commission renews the waiver;

(ii)  provide to the commission the information required by Section 34A-2-1004; and

(iii)  pay a fee established by the commission in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, except that the fee may not exceed $50.

(3)  As of the day on which a business entity described in Subsection (1) employs an employee other than an owner, partner, or corporate officer or director described in Subsection (1)(a):

(a)  the business entity's waiver is invalid; and

(b)  the business entity is required to provide workers' compensation coverage for that employee in accordance with Section 34A-2-201.

(4)  The commission shall deposit a fee collected under this section in the Industrial Accident Restricted Account created in Section 34A-2-705.

(5)  Unless invalidated under Section 34A-2-1005, notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a waiver issued by an insurer that is valid on June 30, 2011, remains valid until its expiration date.



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2011 General Session

